New York, session 2025-2026, S6755.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Clause 5 of subparagraph (i) of the opening paragraph of 2 section 1210 of the tax law, as amended by chapter 249 of the laws of 3 2023, is amended to read as follows: 4 (5) the county of Cattaraugus is hereby further authorized and 5 empowered to adopt and amend local laws, ordinances or resolutions 6 imposing such taxes at a rate which is one percent additional to the 7 three percent rate authorized above in this paragraph for such county 8 for the period beginning March first, nineteen hundred eighty-six and 9 ending November thirtieth, two thousand [twenty-five] twenty-seven; 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10461-01-5